California statutes. Education Code
Each school district which desires an apportionment for a grade level maintained by it, shall submit through its governing board to the board an application therefor in any form and number of copies that the board shall prescribe. Each copy of the application shall be accompanied by a statement of the estimated cost of the project certified by an architect or structural engineer, and by layout plans showing the entire project for which the district desires an apportionment. Estimates of cost for new construction appearing in an application shall not exceed typical
 current costs of comparable new construction by school districts in the same area not receiving or not eligible for apportionment under this chapter, as determined by the Director of General Services, or if there has been no new construction by districts in the area, the estimates of cost shall not exceed the reasonable current cost of similar construction in the area as determined by the Director of General Services. Immediately upon receipt of an application in the prescribed form accompanied by the required estimate of cost, a copy thereof shall be transmitted by the board to the director and to the Director of General Services.

A district may at any time amend or supplement its application.

The Director of General Services shall determine the school district’s financial ability to meet all or a portion of the cost of the project and the amount which the district can contribute toward the cost of the project out of its
 available funds, and shall submit his report thereon to the board.

The directors shall as promptly as possible prepare a report and recommendation with respect to the application and refer the application, report, and recommendation to the Director of General Services, who shall, if he or she finds the documents to be in proper form and otherwise sufficient, refer them to the board. If the Director of General Services finds the documents to be lacking in any respect as to any matter which is subject to the jurisdiction or approval of the director or State Department of Education, he or she shall refer them to the director who shall take any action that may be necessary. The board shall, subject to the provisions of this chapter approve or reject each application referred to it by the Director of General Services. If the board approves of the application, either in whole or in part, it shall, by a resolution adopted by it, apportion to the district from the Public
 School Building Loan Fund the amount applied for, or any portion thereof that the board may deem appropriate. However, it may order that the apportionment or any part thereof shall be paid in progressive installments at the times and under the conditions that it may then prescribe. This shall be known as a conditional apportionment and shall become final only if the vote provided for in Section 15721 is favorable and if bonds are authorized and sold in the amounts prescribed by the board, and the proceeds of the bonds sold earmarked for the project as approved. The conditional apportionment shall remain effective for a period of nine months from the date of the resolution of the board, and if it does not become a final apportionment by the date, it shall become void and the money so apportioned shall become again available for apportionment pursuant to this chapter.

The board may for any good cause that it shall determine, reduce the amount of, or modify any
 provisions relating to, any contribution required of a district under the terms of an apportionment, other than any contribution required of the district under Section 15721 from the sale of bonds. However, the board may not, without the consent of the district, increase the amount of any district contribution under the terms of an apportionment, in the absence of mistake arising from any source, or misrepresentation, concealment, or omission, on the part of the district, intentional or otherwise. The provisions of this paragraph shall be applicable to apportionments heretofore or hereafter made.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15714.

When an apportionment has been made by the board to a school district the board may, upon application of the governing board of the district, authorize the governing board to transfer funds from other authorized purposes if more than one purpose has been authorized in the district by the board, or to make additional apportionments to the district, or both, if the board determines that additional apportionments or transfers are necessary to meet the actual cost of the specific school plant facilities or sites for which the original apportionment was made. An
 apportionment made under this section shall be final if the original apportionment has become final, otherwise it shall become final if and when the original apportionment becomes final.

All provisions of this chapter shall apply to apportionments made under this section, except Sections 15713, 15721, 15722, 15725, and 15726 exclusive of the second paragraph of Section 15726 and any other provisions that may relate to application and eligibility for apportionments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15715.

The board may approve, in whole or in part, an application submitted by a school district under Section 15713 and in the amount, not exceeding the amount applied for, that the board may deem appropriate.

The board may, upon approval of the application, in whole or in part, and subsequently from time to time, make a conditional apportionment or conditional apportionments not exceeding in the aggregate the total amount determined by the board as aforesaid, to the applicant school district from the Public School Building Loan
 Fund for that portion or portions of the project that the board determines the district is ready to proceed with. If the board has approved an application and made an apportionment as to a portion or portions of a project, the board may approve the remaining portion or portions of the project and make an additional apportionment or apportionments within two years after the original approval without requiring a district to issue additional bonds.

The total of the amounts of applications as approved by the board under this section shall not, when added to all amounts apportioned to school districts by the board under Section 15713, exceed 90 percent of the total amount of state school building bonds authorized to be issued and sold by Section 2 of Article XVI of the Constitution of the state.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, all provisions of this chapter relating to apportionments shall apply to apportionments
 made under this section.

Approval of an application under this section shall not be construed as creating or implying any obligation, commitment or promise on the part of the board or the state to make apportionments under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15716.

If, after a conditional apportionment has been made to a school district, legal proceedings initiated prior or subsequent to the making of the conditional apportionment prevent the taking, within the period during which the conditional apportionment remains effective under Section 15713, of the actions necessary to permit the conditional apportionment to become final, the conditional apportionment shall nevertheless remain effective for a period of nine months from the date upon which the legal proceedings are finally determined. The amount of the apportionment may
 be diminished by the board after a second investigation at which the board shall determine whether conditions existing at the time it approved the project for which apportionment was made have so changed that the needs of the district are less than originally determined and if so the conditional apportionment shall be reduced by a corresponding amount.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15717.

With respect to any apportionment made to a school district prior to December 26, 1950, the board may, on the application of the governing board of the district make additional apportionments to the school district for the purchase of the furniture authorized by Section 15706. An apportionment made under this section shall be final if the original apportionment has become final; otherwise it shall become final if and when the original apportionment becomes final.

All provisions of this chapter shall apply to apportionments
 made under this section, except Sections 15713, 15721, 15722, 15725, and 15726, exclusive of the second paragraph of Section 15726, and any other provisions that may relate to applications and eligibility for apportionments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15718.

The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) was by Chapter 13 of the Statutes of 1952 (First Extraordinary Session) made available from the Public School Building Loan Fund for apportionment by the board pursuant to this chapter, except as otherwise provided by this section and to be transferred by the Controller as needed into a separate account in the State School Building Fund which was created in the State Treasury.

Apportionments made under this section shall be available as grants to those school districts to which
 apportionments have been made under this chapter, prior to April 1, 1952, and only for the amounts thereof as are in excess of the apportionments the voters of the districts voted to accept and repay under Sections 15721, 15722, and 15723.

If and when the electors of districts receiving apportionments under this section, vote to accept and repay additional amounts under Sections 15721, 15722, and 15723, the board may make apportionments under other sections of this chapter in substitution in whole or in part of the grants made under this section.

In the event the electors of the district fail to vote to accept and repay the additional amounts or if apportionments covering the amounts are not made under other sections of this chapter, beginning in September 1953, and annually for nine years thereafter, apportionments made to the districts from the State School Fund under Sections 46304, 46305, and 92 or 41050, Sections 41330
 to 41343, inclusive, and Sections 41600 to 41972, inclusive, or any successor thereof, shall be reduced by an amount equivalent to one-tenth of the amount apportioned under this section. This section shall not be applied so as to reduce any average daily attendance apportionment below the constitutional minimum. During the year beginning September 1953, and each year thereafter in which the Controller determines that the apportionment of any district is to be reduced as herein provided, he or she shall deduct the total amount of the annual repayment of each district in equal amounts from each installment of the apportionments made to the district. The amount deducted shall, on order of the Controller, be transferred from the State School Building Fund to the General Fund at the time and for the purpose provided in Section 15903.

Notwithstanding any other law, taxes in the districts shall be increased sufficiently to offset the amounts by which the average daily
 attendance apportionments are reduced under this section. The tax increases shall be made in the manner prescribed under Section 15742 of this chapter.

Any amounts made available by this section which are not apportioned by June 30, 1953, and any recovery by substitution of apportionments made in accordance with this section shall be transferred to the Public School Building Loan Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15719.

No apportionment shall be made for new construction which when added to the area of adequate school construction existing in the applicant school district at the time of application, will provide a total area of school building construction per pupil of the estimated enrollment in excess of that computed under the following schedule: Type of schoolEnrollmentSquare feet per 
pupilElementary school comprisingkindergarten and grades 1to 6, inclusive 

 300 or more

 55Elementary school comprisinggrades 7 and 8 
 750 or more
 75Junior high school comprisinggrades 7 and 9, inclusive 
 750 or more
 75Junior high school comprisinggrades 7 to 10, inclusive 
 750 or more
 75High school comprising grades7 to 12, inclusive 
 750 or more
 80High school comprising grades9 to 12, inclusive 
 750 or more
 80High school comprisinggrades 10 to 12, inclusive 
 750 or more
 80The maximum total building areas per pupil allowed to applicants having schools with smaller estimated enrollments than shown in the above schedule shall be determined by the State Department of Education, and shall be building areas to provide comparable facilities to those enumerated above, and shall be the least building area required to house adequately the estimated enrollment and the normal instructional and other services.

No estimate of enrollment made by an applicant for the purpose of justifying an apportionment shall be made for a longer time than the second fiscal year beyond the fiscal year in which an application is made, and in no case shall be given effect unless approved by the State Department of Education.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15721.

No apportionment to a school district shall become final unless one of the following is satisfied:

(a) The total amount of outstanding bonds of the district exceeds 95 percent of the maximum amount of bonds which the district could have had outstanding under any law on the date the conditional apportionment is made.

(b) If the total amount of the bonds of the district outstanding and unpaid is less than 95 percent of the amount of the
 bonds permitted to be issued by the district, the amount of district bonds outstanding is within twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the total bond limit permitted, as of the date on which the conditional apportionment is made. At the time the board makes a conditional apportionment pursuant to Section 15713, it shall determine what portion of the total amount of bonds which a district is permitted to issue and sell by law shall be issued and sold by the district, the proceeds of which shall be applied toward the cost of the project for which the apportionment is sought. The portion so determined by the board shall be not less than the minimum amount required for the apportionment to become final under this section. Any apportionment made by the board pursuant to Section 15713 shall be conditioned upon the approval and sale of the bonds by the district.

No apportionment to a district shall become final unless, at an election called by the governing board of
 the district, two-thirds of the qualified electors of the district voting thereat have authorized the governing board of the district to accept, expend, and repay, as provided in this chapter, an apportionment under the provisions of this chapter. The election shall be combined with and held at the same time as the bond election to authorize the amount of bonds required by the board, if any, and shall be called, held, and conducted in the same manner as are elections to authorize the issuance of district bonds, except that the ballot, in addition to the bond proposition, shall contain substantially the following words:

“Shall the governing board of the ____ school district be authorized to accept and expend an apportionment in an amount not to exceed ____ dollars ($____) from the State of California under and subject to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 15700) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code which amount is subject
 to repayment as provided by said chapter? Yes__ No__.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15722.

Immediately after the result of the election has been determined, the county superintendent of schools shall make a certificate in duplicate stating whether the bonds have been authorized in the amount prescribed by the board and whether the school district has authorized the acceptance and expenditure of the apportionment. One copy of the certificate shall be sent to the board and one copy to the Controller. When the bonds authorized have been issued and sold and the proceeds thereof made available for the purposes of the application, the county superintendent of
 schools shall also certify this fact to the board and the Controller. Upon the receipt by the board of the certificate stating that the bonds have been issued and sold and the proceeds thereof made available for the purposes of the application, the apportionment shall become final.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15723.

The election by a school district upon the acceptance, expenditure, and repayment of an apportionment prescribed by Section 15721 may be called and held either before or after the making of an apportionment.

All elections held prior to October 13, 1950, whether before or after the making of an apportionment, are hereby validated and confirmed if otherwise called and held pursuant to law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15724.

Whenever a conditional apportionment has been made, and the county auditor has inadvertently and erroneously included in his certification of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the school district the bonded indebtedness of another school district having the same, or substantially the same, boundaries, which bonded indebtedness is less than 2 percent of the total amount of the total bonded indebtedness certified, and thereafter an election upon the issuance of new bonds in the amount required by the board has been had and the vote thereon has been in favor of the
 issuance of the bonds, and the board has certified to the Controller that the apportionment to the district has become final, the final apportionment is hereby confirmed, ratified, and validated, and any expenditure of money from the Public School Building Loan Fund according to the terms of the final apportionment is hereby confirmed, ratified, and validated.

Any bonds erroneously certified, however, shall not be taken into consideration in making the computation required by Section 15721.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15725.

No apportionment shall be made to a school district for any grade level if the estimated cost of the project, as approved by the Director of General Services, is (1) an amount which would result in an apportionment to the district exceeding the amount authorized at the district election held under Section 15721, or (2) an amount which if raised by the issuance and sale of bonds of the district running for 25 years bearing the current going rate of interest as determined by the board and the principal of which is payable in 25 equal annual payments, would require the
 levy of a tax under Section 15250 upon property in the district which would, when added to the tax actually being levied upon property in the district for the grade level as determined by the Director of General Services under that section, amount to less than thirty cents ($0.30) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of property in the district during the next fiscal year. Beginning in 1981–82, the amount shall be the levy of a tax which would amount to less than 0.075 percent of full valuation of property in the district during the next fiscal year.

At the time the board makes an apportionment, it shall, with the approval of the Director of General Services, fix the interest to be paid by the district on the sum apportioned to it at a rate equal to the effective rate paid by the state upon the bonds sold from the proceeds of which the apportionment is made, giving effect to the price at which the bonds are sold and the premium, if any, paid
 thereon, adjusted to the next highest one-eighth of 1 percent, to cover the cost of sale and issuance of the bonds and costs of administration, to be compounded annually through the 30th day of June of each year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15726.

As used in Section 15725 of the Education Code, the phrase “adjusted to the next highest one-eighth of 1 percent” means “increased by a full one-eighth of 1 percent.” It is hereby declared that this construction is not intended as a change in the present law, but as a declaration of the existing law, and shall apply to any interest rate heretofore or hereafter fixed by the board under said section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15727.

No apportionment shall be made to a district for the construction, reconstruction, or alteration of, or addition to, school buildings if the requirements prescribed by this code for the construction of school buildings are not met by the plans for the entire building program of the district in connection with which the district applied for an apportionment or for any project or part thereof which has not been approved by the State Department of Education.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15728.

Each district to which an apportionment has been made under this chapter shall repay the principal amount of the apportionment and the accrued interest thereon in the amount and in the manner hereinafter provided in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15729.

The following definitions apply to the computations and determinations required to be made under Sections 15730, 15732, and 15733, and they apply with respect to each grade level of a district for which grade level an apportionment has become final during any preceding fiscal year.

(a) “Forty-cent tax amount” means the amount that would be produced by a tax of forty cents ($0.40) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation, to and including 1980–81 fiscal year. For the 1981–82 fiscal year
 and thereafter, the tax shall be 0.10 percent of the full valuation. This tax amount shall exclude the assessed valuation of solvent credits and other intangible property, for the current fiscal year within the district;

(b) “Thirty-cent tax amount” means the amount that would be produced by a tax of thirty cents ($0.30) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of such assessed valuation to and including the 1980–81 fiscal year. For 1981–82 and thereafter, the tax shall be 0.075 percent of such full valuation: and

(c) “Ten-cent tax amount” means the amount that would be produced by a tax of ten cents ($0.10) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of such assessed valuation to and including the 1980–81 fiscal year. For the 1981–82 fiscal year and thereafter, the tax shall be 0.025 percent of the full value.

(d) “Eligible bonded
 debt service” means the amount raised and to be raised by the district during the current fiscal year for the repayment of principal and interest on the portion of the bonded indebtedness of the district that was incurred for each such grade level prior to the date of the first final apportionment for any grade level to the district under this chapter, computed as provided in Section 15730.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15730.

On or before the first day of December of each fiscal year, the Director of General Services shall determine for each grade level and certify to the Controller the eligible bonded debt service for the district, as follows:

(a) He or she shall determine the amount of the bonded indebtedness that was incurred by the district for each grade level, when bonds were issued and sold for purposes of more than one grade level. When one or more additional apportionments have been made to a grade level of a
 district, conditioned upon the issuance and sale of additional bonds of the district, the Director of General Services shall determine and include in the eligible bonded debt service and in his or her certificate the amount raised and to be raised by the district during the current fiscal year for the payment of principal and interest on that portion of the additional bonded indebtedness of the district that was incurred for each grade level as a condition to receiving the additional apportionment.

(b) If the Director of General Services determines in any fiscal year that the amount certified to the Controller as the eligible bonded debt service during the last preceding fiscal year is more than the amount actually raised by the district for the repayment of principal and interest of the bonded indebtedness referred to in subdivision (d) of Section 15729 and subdivision (a) of this section, then the Director of General Services shall subtract
 from the amount determined as the eligible bonded debt service for the current fiscal year an amount equal to the difference between the amount actually raised by the district during the preceding fiscal year for the repayment of the bonded indebtedness and the amount so certified by the Director of General Services.

(c) If the Director of General Services determines in any fiscal year that the amount certified to the Controller as the eligible bonded debt service during the last preceding fiscal year is less than the amount actually raised by the district for the repayment of principal and interest of the bonded indebtedness referred to in subdivision (d) of Section 15729 and subdivision (a) of this section, then the Director of General Services shall add to the amount determined as the eligible bonded debt service for the current fiscal year an amount equal to the difference between the amount actually raised by the district during the
 preceding fiscal year for the repayment of the bonded indebtedness and the amount so certified by the Director of General Services.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15731.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a school district otherwise eligible to receive a conditional apportionment under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 16000) of this part may apply for an adjustment of annual repayment obligations under this chapter.

The board may require any information that is necessary to determine the number of units of estimated average daily attendance for which the district would have been eligible to construct school facilities under this chapter, if the conditional apportionment
 had been made and had become final. The units shall be known as “eligible attendance units.” The board shall then determine an “eligible facilities cost” by multiplying the number of the eligible attendance units by the average cost of housing elementary or high school pupils as set forth in the latest report to the Legislature required under Section 16098.

In any fiscal year in which the school district is, in the judgment of the board, operating sufficient year-round classes to provide housing for the eligible attendance units, the Director of General Services shall add to the amount which he or she is required to certify to the Controller under Section 15730 an amount equal to one-twentieth of such eligible facilities costs.

The additional amount so certified shall be considered for all purposes of this article as eligible bonded debt service.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15732.

On or before the first day of January of each fiscal year, the Controller shall compute for each grade level of a district for which grade level an apportionment has become final during any preceding fiscal year the 40-cent tax amount, the 30-cent tax amount and the 10-cent tax amount.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15733.

On or before the first day of January of each fiscal year the Controller shall determine the annual repayment, if any, to be due from each district during the next succeeding fiscal year, as follows:

(a) If, for any grade level of a district, the amount of the eligible bonded debt service exceeds the 40 cents ($0.40) tax amount, no annual repayment shall be due the state from the district with respect to the grade level during the next succeeding fiscal year.

(b) If, for any grade level of a district, the 40 cents ($0.40) tax amount is greater than the eligible bonded debt service, the amount of the excess shall constitute the annual repayment due the state with respect to the grade level during the next succeeding fiscal year. However, if the eligible bonded debt service is less than the 10 cents ($0.10) tax amount, the annual repayment shall equal the 30 cents ($0.30) tax amount.

(c) The total repayment from each district is the sum of the annual repayments determined for each grade level of the district under this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15734.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, and regardless of how many apportionments are made to a grade level of a school district under the provisions of this chapter, the total annual repayment for the grade level during any fiscal year, covering all the apportionments, shall not exceed the amount that would be computed under Sections 15729 to 15735, inclusive, for any one of the apportionments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15735.

The Controller shall, during the next fiscal year following that in which he or she determines the annual repayment as herein provided, deduct the total amount of the annual repayment of each district in equal amounts from each of the February, March, April, and May installments of the apportionments made to the district from the State School Fund under Sections 46304, 46305, and 92 or 41050, Sections 41330 to 41343, inclusive, and Sections 41600 to 41972, inclusive, and, on order of the Controller, the amount so deducted shall be transferred to the Public School
 Building Loan Fund. All money transferred to the Public School Building Loan Fund under this section shall be available only for transfer to the General Fund under Section 15903.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15736.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, whenever in any fiscal year, pursuant to Chapter 5, Part 9, Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a refund is made or a judgment rendered, as the case may be, for the return of an amount collected as school district taxes levied during a previous year upon secured or unsecured personal property, because it was determined that the property was exempt from taxation, and the property so determined to be exempt equals 1 percent, or more, of the assessed valuation in the school district upon which school
 district taxes for the previous year were levied, the Controller shall reduce the annual repayment of the district and the amount deducted from the State School Fund apportionment of the district for the fiscal year next succeeding that in which the refund was made or judgment rendered, by that amount by which the annual repayment and deduction of the district would have been reduced for the fiscal year next succeeding that in which the taxes were levied had the assessed valuation upon which the annual repayment was computed not included an amount of assessed valuation equal to the amount of assessed valuation of the property so determined to be exempt.

The amount of annual repayment and deduction, reduced as required by this section, shall be the amount deducted by the Controller for the purposes of Sections 15735, 15741, and 15742 for the fiscal year in which the reduction is made.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15737.

(a) Upon request of the district, the Controller shall use in computing the “40-cent, 30-cent, and 10-cent tax amounts” under Section 15732 the difference between the total assessed valuation of property in a district as shown on the equalized assessment roll for the current fiscal year and the assessed valuation of property as shown on the equalized assessment roll for the current fiscal year, in excess of 2 percent of the total assessed valuation, with respect to which revenues of the district taxes levied in the 1954–1955 fiscal year, or
 thereafter, have been impounded by the county auditor pursuant to Section 14240. Beginning with the 1981–82 fiscal year, the amount in excess of 0.5 percent of the total assessed valuation shall be used in the computation. If the request is received prior to August 1, 1955, with respect to the impounding of revenues of taxes levied during the 1954–1955 fiscal year, the Controller shall recompute the annual repayment of the district due during the 1955–1956 fiscal year on the basis of the reduced assessed valuation, and, on or before September 1, 1955, notify the officers and board referred to in Section 15741 of the recomputed annual repayment for the 1955–1956 fiscal year, and of the recomputed amount to be deducted from the State School Fund apportionment to the district during the 1955–1956 fiscal year.

(b) Whenever, after July 1, 1955, the county auditor notifies the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Controller of the release of
 impounded tax revenues to the school district, the Controller shall add to the annual repayment of the district, for the first fiscal year or second fiscal year next succeeding that in which the notification of release was made, that amount by which the annual repayment of the district for a previous fiscal year was reduced by reason of the exclusion of assessed valuation with respect to tax revenues impounded and thereafter released.

(c) The amount of annual repayment and deduction, increased or reduced as required by this section, shall be the amount deducted by the Controller for the purposes of Sections 15735, 15741, and 15742 for the fiscal year in which the increase or reduction occurs.

(d) If a request is received from a school district and an annual repayment reduced pursuant to subdivision (a), Section 15736 shall not apply with respect to any tax revenues to which
 subdivision (a) applies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15738.

The Controller shall make the deduction provided by Section 15735 during each fiscal year, as herein provided, until the principal amount of the apportionment made to the district for the grade level, and all accrued interest due thereon, has been withheld; but no interest shall accrue or become due and payable to the state with respect to the principal amount of any apportionment after the expiration of 25 years from the first day of July of the fiscal year next succeeding the date of the warrant issued by the Controller covering the payment to the county treasurer
 of each portion of the apportionment. At the expiration of 30 years from the first day of July of the fiscal year next succeeding the date of the warrant issued by the Controller covering the payment to the county treasurer of each portion of the apportionment, any unpaid balance of the principal amount of the apportionment, including all interest included in the principal amount, shall be canceled on the books of the Controller, and the state shall have no further right to the repayment of the unpaid balance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15739.

The Controller shall certify to the board the cancellation of the unpaid balance of the principal amount of the apportionment. Upon receipt of the certification, the board shall, in the name of the state, convey to the district all sites purchased and improved, all equipment purchased, and all buildings constructed, reconstructed, altered, or added to, from moneys provided by the apportionment covered by the cancellation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15740.

The Controller shall determine and maintain a record of the amount due the state in connection with each apportionment made to each grade level of a district under this chapter. He or she shall compute interest on the original amount of the apportionment at the rate fixed by the board, from the date of issuance of the Controller’s warrant covering the payment to the county treasurer of any portion of the apportionment until the first day of July of the fiscal year next succeeding that in which the warrant was issued. Thereafter, interest shall accrue to and be
 compounded as a part of the principal amount due the state pursuant to the apportionment through the 30th day of the following June of each year, until the principal and interest have been paid, or until the interest ceases to accrue, as provided in this chapter. Interest on unpaid school building aid apportionments shall be computed as if the annual repayment were credited on the first day of July of the fiscal year in which the repayment is withheld.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15741.
